Illinois, session 104th, SB2740.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 5adding Section 1-1-14 as follows: 6    (65 ILCS 5/1-1-14 new)7    Sec. 1-1-14. Home rule powers for nonhome rule 8municipalities.9    (a) Upon adoption of an enacting ordinance by a majority 10vote of the corporate authorities then holding office, a 11municipality with a population of more than 5,000 inhabitants 12may exercise the powers and authorities provided to home rule 13units under Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 14Constitution.15    (b) A municipality that has adopted an ordinance under 16subsection (a) may rescind the local enactment of powers and 17authorities under this Section by adoption of an ordinance 18approved by a majority vote of the corporate authorities then 19holding office, or by approval of a referendum submitted to 20the voters of the municipality, which shall include an 21effective date not less than 6 months after its adoption.22    (c) If a municipality that has adopted an ordinance under 23subsection (a) suffers a loss in population so that its   SB2740- 2 -LRB104 14801 RTM 27944 b1population determined as provided in Section 1-7-2 is 5,000 or 2less, then the municipality may continue to exercise the 3powers of a home rule unit until it holds a referendum to 4become a home rule unit. Unless the referendum is held sooner, 5the municipal clerk shall certify for submission to the voters 6of the municipality at the next general election following the 7determination of population, in the manner provided by the 8general election law, the proposition of whether the 9municipality shall elect to become a home rule unit. If the 10municipality does not elect to become a home rule unit, then 11the municipality may not continue to exercise the powers of a 12home rule unit. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 141, 2027.